Wisconsin, session 2025, SB842.
do enact as follows:SB842,11Section 1. 20.435 (1) (gd) of the statutes is created to read:SB842,2,5220.435 (1) (gd) Violence prevention grants. All moneys received from taxes 3imposed and collected under subch. III of ch. 139 with respect to vapor products, as 4defined in s. 139.75 (14), for grants to local health departments or tribal health 5centers under s. 255.20 (4).SB842,26Section 2. 255.20 (4) of the statutes is created to read:SB842,2,77255.20 (4) (a) In this subsection:SB842,2,881. “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning given in s. 165.85 (2) (bv).SB842,2,992. “Tribal law enforcement agency” has the meaning given in s. 165.83 (1) (e).SB842,2,1810(b) Establish a program to distribute moneys from the appropriation under s. 1120.435 (1) (gd) to local health departments or tribal health centers that apply for 12moneys to conduct violence prevention programs or to award grants to 13organizations to conduct violence prevention programs. A local health department 14or tribal health center may not distribute grant funds under this subsection to a 15law enforcement agency, a tribal law enforcement agency, or any entity that 16provides services in conjunction with or through a law enforcement agency or tribal 17law enforcement agency. Grant applications are due no later than June 30 of each 18fiscal year.SB842,319Section 3. Fiscal changes.SB842,3,520(1) Violence prevention grant program administration. In the schedule 21under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of health services under 22s. 20.435 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $30,000 to 23increase the authorized FTE positions for the department by 1.0 GPR position for 1the administration of the violence prevention grant program under s. 255.20 (4). In 2the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of health 3services under s. 20.435 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is 4increased by $120,000 to provide funding for the position authorized under this 5subsection.SB842,3,66